Utah statutes.
49-17-403.   Minimum allowance.

Beginning July 1, 1990, all retirees or beneficiaries under this chapter who receive an allowance less than $1,000 per month shall have the allowance increased 10%, but the increased allowance may not equal more than $1,000.

